District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-110

Qualifications required of teachers and officials.

Repealed.

History

June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 319, ch. 3446, § 6
June 26, 1912, 37 Stat. 156, ch. 182
Feb. 25, 1929, 45 Stat. 1276, ch. 314, § 1
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 14, 29 DCR 49

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-114.
1973 Ed., § 31-114.